
                   no consistent grading
                
                   I hated her class.  Her tests are ridiculous and have multiple correct answers.
                
                   Very interesting class that I absolutely loved!  The instructor is amazing!  But you must read the text and perform all the assignments if you expect to pass!
                
                   Great professor, but the class is challenging and she expects alot out of the students. SHe really cares about her students and even helped me get an internship!
                
                   I didn't learan anything from her...all she does is print out worksheets and then give you the answers, so if you're good at memorizing, you'll do fine.  The tests are taken DIRECTLY from the worksheets, and the online quizzes offered.  I didn't learn a single thing from her, because she was too busy dancing to music infron of her class...seriously
                
                   No Comments
                
                   You will have 3 group papers. They will be about 10 pages long each, and he grades these hard, so make sure you are in a good group. Each week there will be a quiz and a discussion post. Quizzes are pretty easy, everything comes straight from the book.
                
                   I would not take this guy if you dont need to. Totally takes the convenience out of a online class.
                
                   This class is rediculous and I will try my hardest to never take Sollosy again. He requires a large amount of pointless &quot;busy work&quot; and extremely subjective answers, and then doesn't respond to e-mails. He will waste your precious time in class and take attendence. He has no clear grading criteria so he can basically give you any gradewithoutcause.
                
                   Taken online Fall 2010. Class seemed to be on autopilot at times. Professor likes to have team assignments which I hate.  One lazy team member can ruin your grade and there is little you can do to argue your objections.  Exams were tough and had a lot of errors, but good luck arguing that too.
                
                   Overall not a bad class.  Taken duing the Winter Intersession so it was like drinking water through a fire hose, but I earned a &quot;B&quot;.
                
                   I liked this course, but he never e-mailed me back when I had questions.
                
                   His class requires a lot of work from discussions to case studies. However, all the tests and case studies are done in a group so it is very critical that you choose reliable group members.
                
                   Mr. Sollosy knows his stuff when it comes to mgt. The problem is that he knows that he knows! While I learned a lot about mgt in his class, I also learned a lot about how great he and his accomplishments are, and how much he dislikes our school and that he's too good to even be living in this area! I wouldn't take him again if I had another option.
                
                   Very good prof!
                
                   He is a good teacher. His tests are the worst to take. I attended ever class and took all the notes but it didnt help. I even went to 4.0 and it helped somewhat. He says he took a test making class. When you take the test you are always left with 2-3 answers that look & sound. Try your best and take do all extra credit. Attend evryday to do well.
                
                   He is a really fun professor. You have to come to class and take good notes to do well in class. He definately tried to keep class interesting for his students though. Would take a class with him again.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Engaging professor. (Reminds me a little of Jon Stewart, actually) What you learn in this class can, well, help you to 'win friends and influence people.' Who *wouldn't* that help&#63;
                
                   I dont know what these people are talking about but this class was easy and he was a great prof.
                
                   Tests suck
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome class, the prof. talks about his experiences in the sports world. Tests are tough but fair. Does take attendance
                
                   Really easy. Most of the material is from the powerpoint slides, but she's really straight forward. Read the book and the slides and you'll get an A.
                
                   Fake. Lack of communication. Mysterious grading - you'll have no clue of your standing in the class until you get the final grade. Forces a stringent, unimaginative presentation style.  Stupid comments get more points.
                
                   If you attend class there's no reason to receive less than a B in this class. Reading the book isn't necessary,  but I've been told that it helps (I personally didn't read the book and I did fine). Not an easy class, but I wouldn't say it was hard.
                
                   All of the material in this course is very vague. Mrs. Hailey doesn't make it any easier, either. Grading criteria is based on four multiple choice exams. The tests evaluate your ability to interpret the best answer, out of two or three, that may also be correct. It's completely unethical. If it's not a requirement, avoid this class.
                
                   Professor Keiper is awesome. He keeps the class alive with corny jokes and great enthusiasm. Lectures can be long but for me they were interesting. Great class and I recommend him to anyone interested.
                
                   She is a very talented individual and expects a lot from her students. She challenges the upper limits of each individuals intellect and understanding by using HBS cases and real world practicum.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's okay but very vague. Expects to do all the work but doesn't provide enough support.
                
                   He's a Canadian who is pretty hilarious and an all around good guy.
                
                   Great guy, really knows his stuff.
                
                   Class is very tough but I have never met a professor who cares more about her students than Professor Mahajan does.
                
                   He is such a nice dresser.  He relates so well to the students.  Indeed he is a hottie.
                
                   Has the shiniest shoes eveeerrrr!! Nice dress clothes!! Too bad he has to keep the door open.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME  :-D  Love the guy, Love the class!!! :-D
                
                   What a great Prof! This guy is young and new at teaching, and has a strong passion for helping students. I highly recommend taking Prof. Sosa's classes.
                
                   Keith Swim was the most frustrating professor I've ever had. His exams take the most irrelevant information from the textbook (that he wrote, and is filled with errors) and as a result you have to memorize the entire thing. 4.0 and Go definitely helped a lot with this class. I put in more time than any other class and did much worse.
                
                   Tests get harder as you go & final is cumulative. He loves trick questions so read carefully & know the stuff well. You NEED the textbook. Take notes on the study guide. He posts all lectures online - go re-listen to them. He gives awesome examples to help understand concepts. Study before you take the online quizzes. Don't take his humor seriously
                
                   Good professor but makes the class 100x harder than it has to be. If you dont read the textbook, go to 4.0 and study for 10+ hours you really dont even have a chance
                
                   I like the material and Swim is a great, kind professor underneath his tough act and extremely dry sense of humor. But the tests are SO tricky and I absolutely dread them! You have to stay on top of the material (book is essential) as you learn it to do well on the test. do not try to cram. Overall a doable, but tough class.
                
                   He is very sarcastic and almost always in a bad mood or complaining about something. His class is required and he makes it a lot harder than it should be. It's doable, but it requires a lot of time and memorizing. Be prepared to have to study a lot. There are quizzes each week and they make up a good majority of the final grade which helps.
                
                   Great guy overall. Charitable and cares about the success of his students. Be ready to study your butt off for a whole semester to receive high C's and low B's on tests. You will learn a ton and suffer a lot of pain while doing it. 
                
                   Hes great, test will make you think. Read and reread if you want a decent grade. Go to class the lectures go over the material in the book and specific cases or info that he puts on the test.
                
                   Swim is a very good professor. I'd definitely take him again. He presents the subject matter in a way that keeps you interested. I'd STRONGLY recommend 4.0 and Go. The tutor for 211 is hilarious and he really knows his stuff. I didn't even take notes in class. I just listened attentively, and studied the study guide that was provided by 4.0 and Go.
                
                   Expected-same as others say-HARD. Lectures are actually interesting & he explains most things well.  Reading the study guide & skim the book to make sure nothing is missed. TESTS ARE TRICKY!! That's the key factor to this test. Must "think like Swim" to not get tripped up. 4.0 & Go can be helpful--but you still must remember to think like Swim.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF. The amount of homework he gives you is ridiculous and not necessary. One chapter  25 terms , 15 cases, and 48 essay questions. I am not exaggerating.
                
                   Swim is a great guy and makes lectures interesting and keeps your attention by cracking jokes throughout. Although this was the hardest class I've taken at A&M, I still ended the semester with a B. He is very generous at the end of the semester with curves. Take every bit of extra credit he gives and make sure you read and study a lot!
                
                   Great teacher. Taught the subject crystal clear and let me argue my viewpoints always giving time for me to get out my side on the topic while keeping on track.
                
                   Hardest class I've taken at A&M. Swim likes to make jokes during class, but he gets angry easily & he's not afraid to call someone out in front of 300 students. I would absolutely recommend going to 4.0 if you want to pass his class. He does curve really well, which is nice.  He's not a terrible prof, but the class is definitely a tough one.
                
                   ALWAYS GO TO THE TAs OFFICE AFTER EACH EXAM.  There is always more than one mistake and he doesn't really care. it is one of the hardest classes I have ever taken.
                
                   He tries to trick you with seemingly insignificant technicalities on the tests. He doesn't test on if you know the basic concepts, he tests on if you know exactly what he/the text book said. I had never gotten a grade lower than a B before taking his class and I got a D in his class. I wouldn't recommend him as a professor.
                
                   Good guy. Gives a decent curve every test and has a big heart. He'll help you out if you ask for help. I didn't read the book, the study guide is a condensed version of it and was easier for me to get through. Seriously don't wait till the last minute to study for these tests.
                
                   Great professor and knows what he is talking about. Go to class and take notes, and you will do fine on the tests. One of my favorite professors at A&M.
                
                   He is really good prof! Liked the the class a lot!
                
                   Swim's a great guy and very interesting. His lecture style and textbook are a little annoying, but if you study your notes, textbook, and study guide, you'll be alright. Don't slack or get behind!
                
                   Tough class, but rewarding. I got an A, but I studied about 15-20 hours per test plus the reading between classes. Know the book like the bible and pay close attention in class. Overall, interesting class, but difficult.
                
                   Creativity and Innovation class was great. Learned things about myself, and how to manage organizational innovation.  Professor was always available to help me.
                
                   Tests are pretty difficult. Study the packet and know it word by word and you should do fine. Started doing that on the last two tests and got Bs, but it was to late to fix my first two. Make sure to pay attention in class because some some stuff she says is on the test. 
                
                   Very abstract concepts taught in this class. She tries to use movie references to teach certain topics, but they are a stretch and generally don't help illustrate her point. The tests are structured so that one word in the word problem can mean a totally different answer and the answers are up to her interpretation (best fit answers). 
                
                   The tests are nearly impossible to get As on
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Favorite Prof so far, if you go to class you will the class, simple as that, test are super easy if you go to class and listen, he lets you know what to study for and that is exactly whats on the test would definitely recommend. 
                
                   Dr. Welch is my favorite prof I've had at A&M so far. He is hilarious and actually made me look forward to going to an 8AM. He doesn't post notes but he tells you exactly what's going to be on the test, you just have to come to class. Easy A if you pay attention. There are a lot of guest lectures. There is no textbook. Awesome professor!
                
                   If you are looking for an easy A class, this is the one for you. Write down whatever he tells you to and you will be okay. Random quizzes throughout the semester that WILL benefit you. HE GIVES YOU ALL THE ANSWERS! Guest speakers are really interesting and the test questions over them are extremely obvious. Got a B because didn't do well on 1 test
                
                   I took Dr. Welch twice because I didn't show up to class my freshman year. Don't let the MWF 8 AM scare you. Attendance isn't mandatory but it might as well be if you want to pass. Go to class, take notes straight from the powerpoint, and he tells you what is and isn't on the class. No reason you shouldn't get an A or B. Would take again.
                
                   Very down to earth. Lots of ridiculous questions about lectures on tests. Good class, solid A or B.
                
                   I cant say enough good things about this professor, everything was crystal clear his lectures were fun and engaging even at 8am. The only bad thing was he is not in class alot becuase he works for Halliburton. This was not a big problem for me but I know it was for some people in the class.
                
                   He was simply amazing. A lot of successful business people come in and speak to you. As long as you take notes, study the easy content, and attend class to hear the guest speakers talk, you won't have a single problem getting an A in this class, and I am not one to be considered an amazing student
                
                   Dr. Welch is probably the best professor at A&M. Go to class, take notes, highlight what he says will be on the exam, get an A. It's that simple!
                
                   Dr. Welch is a truly incredible man, I can't do him justice in only  400 characters! He really loves his students and is passionate about teaching. He brings in great speakers too. If you come to class, you should do well.  I definitely recommend taking this class even if you're not a Business MGMT major. 
                
                   Great Prof. Studied about 2 hours per test. Barely Got my A. Great guy and will give tips on making the grade. Interesting prof, would recommend no matter what. has random class quizzes (10 points on 100 point test) so be in class.
                
                   Great guy overall. Got a B- because I didn't really try. Go to class everyday and study 3-5 hours for each test and you'll get an A no problem. Pretty straight forward, if you can make a friend or two in class so in case you can't go they can give you notes because test questions come straight form the lectures
                
                   Hands down one of the best professors that I have ever had. I would recommend this class to everyone!! Excellent professor, his class is fun and energetic.
                
                   By far the most passionate and fun professor you will probably ever have. He makes waking up at 8 something you almost look forward to. If you attend class and take notes you will receive and A as long as you study at least a little bit.
                
                   Go to class take notes and you will make an A. Be careful you just might learn something if your not careful.
                
                   Dr. Welch is one of the most passionate teachers that you will find during your time at Texas A&M. Class is extremely easy if you go to class and take notes or simply ask friends for them. Just make sure you attend class on time for the quizzes. 3 Quizes, 5 tests, fun lectures and a LOT of guest speakers. Highly recommend this class.
                
                   Dr. Welch was an awesome prof! I learned a lot, especially from guest speakers. Attendance is mandatory only because everything he says is on the exams, seriously, it's verbatim also be on time he gives random easy quizzes that are helpful in exams. Overall you will love Dr. Welch!
                
                   Extremely good professor. You will have a wide variety of speakers in this class. Even though attendance is not mandatory you will want to go.
                
                   Absolutely zero outside work. Entire course is based off of 5 tests (and he drops the lowest test grade!) &quot;Final&quot; isn't comprehensive. Pop quiz before each test that counts as 10% of the test but it's not difficult and sometimes he'll flat out give you the answer. AMAZING professor! Definitely would recommend taking this class!
                
                   Best prof ever at A&M! You have to go to class because he doesn't use the book, and his tests are based on examples. A lot of student athletes in this class....so it's designed to boost your GPA. Great speakers and plenty of extra credit opportunities!
                
                   Nicest professor I have ever had. You don't use the book at all, don't even bother buying it. Everything you need to know is in his lectures. WRITE DOWN HIS EXAMPLES! The majority of the test questions are examples he uses in lecture. Many cool speakers. Nice and helpful TA. Easy A.
                
                   Good course, easy teacher. This was an online 8 week course with well defined objectives. Lots of reading and writing, but she graded pretty easy, just follow the instructions and you'll do fine.
                
                   The course material will definitely prepare you if you are seeking practical information on being an entrepreneur.  The book is an easy read and definitely 100% related to test material.  Expectations are laid out in the syllabus so follow the due dates and you should do fine.
                
                   I learned a  lot, but our business group project, business presentation, case study, group peer evaluation, and final were all graded a week after finals closed.  Absolutely NO feedback on the first business plan we ever wrote, and this is an entrepreneurial business class.  Also, the rough drafts received 0 feedback.
                
                   Dr. Collins is a great professor! The book actually gets used and is very informative. No twenty page papers to write! Extra credit for online chat sessions that have good information. Do your work and research and you will do well in this class. One of the most informative I have ever taken.
                
                   Take him if you want to learn and receive A at the same time. As long as you devote some time for the class, you should get an A.
                
                   Dr. C is a very knowledgeable professor. There were 2 exams (a midterm & final) which were 100% related to the textbook, one case study, weekly class assignments, an individual student project, and weekly journal postings. Also, attending or viewing ClassLive sessions will yield extra credit points. Dr. C presents the subject clearly.
                
                   Stay away! He was one of the nicest guys ever, however, he did not prepare his students for the exam. The homework was irrelevant and he did not work through problems in the ClassLive sessions. As a straight-A student, I strongly advise you to stay away.
                
                   Awesome class.  Dr. Collins actually wants people to succeed.  Xtra Credit for online class attendance.  Exams can be accessed multiple times over a time frame.  Do the work, pay attention, read the book, exams rely heavily on this, get the A
                
                   Very good teacher, took Entrepreneurship.  He really wants everyone to succeed and does a good job teaching the material.  Highly recommend.
                
                   Dr. Collins is a superior professor with genuine caring and desire for students to succeed in class and in starting a new venture.  Every student wanting to be an entrepreneur should take his course! Be sure to attend his weekly evening ClassLive discussions if you are an online student like me (Fall 2008).
                
                   Dr. Collins is great at teaching from a real world perspective.  His Entrepreneurship expererience is tested and proven.  Read the book, do the assignments, and you will make an A.
                
                   The books choosen were intresting and informative to real life. Her test were consistant with the book information. She graded very fair. A lot of my on line classes I felt like a homework machine. She wasn't so unrealistic with the homework. She actually taught us. Highly recommend.
                
                   She was super easy. We had four sections which included a quiz, discussion, and assignment in each. There was one research paper due at the end of the term. The books you read are very small. Tests were easy and paper was a piece of cake. I got a 100 in the class for my final grade.
                
                   He is one of those professors that you just  hate to love.  He will make you work for it.  You will hit the ground running immediately, so be prepared. It is a lot of work, the most i had so far.  That being said however, i think he is the best professor i had so far.  I learned quite a bit.  If you are looking for an easy class, look elsewhere.
                
                   This is my 2nd time taking this professor and he's simply the best.  You will read a lot, the papers will be long, but if you cite a lot in your work, you will do fine.  He's truly inspired me to continue in my studies.
                
                   He has an inflated sense of self. He has experience in management consultation,  wouldn't say he's good at it. He's an academic guy through-and-through. He believe in LOTS of references , almost to the point where you feel like you're just copying and pasting the entire time. He also will send you LOTS of references, of his own work. Bleh, avoid.
                
                   One of the best professors I've taken so far.  Very responsive to questions.  Very helpful and encouraging.  Papers are long, but if you put in the time and effort and don't fall behind, you will be successful in his class.  I would definitely recommend taking him for any class he teaches.
                
                   The best teacher I've had so far, very understanding and considerate. The class is not easy but if you listen to his lectures and do the research you'll do fine. Make sure you write all you find on your papers and reference them. He is not a tough grader but you have to make sure you do the work, that's how I made an A. I would take him again.
                
                   One of the best professors I have had in my academic career. He is knowledgeable & his lectures reflect that. The papers are long and time-consuming, but if you do the research and use his  e-mails as guidelines you will do great. Due to personal issues I had to write my papers from a hospital room, but I still managed to get an A on each one. 
                
                   The class is very interesting but there is a lot of literature reading that is required.  Be prepared to read hundreds of research literature articles but it is useful and enjoyable.  I personally learned a lot going through the literature and would definitely recommend this class.
                
                   Use the literature, associate the outcomes, and be a creative thinker and writer.
                
                   One of my favorite courses.  Very intensive writing, research, and understanding.  Good instructor.  Put in the work and you'll make an A.
                
                   Top in his field, top professor, you will learn a great deal. Lots of research- reading and writing. Don't worry about the grade, just apply yourself and follow his directions and you will earn an A. Enjoyable course, learned a great deal, really liked Dr. Humphreys!
                
                   Excellent prof. Period. Not only he teachs you best theories. He practically applies the theories  as prof. He motivates you, he guides you, he challenges you, he simply tells you he hates grading aspect of teaching.A student who thinks same way would love the class.You will be an expert on matters at the end of your semister.Lot of work worth it!!
                
                   One of my best exprience so far and i still have final case to submit. In short period of time of summer I have learned more than whole semesiter. With full interest. I read and read. I am one of those ppl who is not fun of reading. But this prof motivate you to read & read. you will learn much in this course than in the entire program.
                
                   I've taken this professor twice now. He's amazing and deserves to be at an ivy league school.  Fantastic!!!
                
                   It was a crazy semester, but at the end every bit was worth it. Learned a lot, be prepared to read hundreds of research articles and hard work. Best professor till date.
                
                   Expert in leadership, like the way he challeges us through research - statements of understanding (SOU. Highly recommend his leadership course as an elective for your MBA, plan on getting busy!
                
                   Best professor in TAMU-C. He is a bit tough but he guides you really well thru the research papers and makes u think rather than giving out his opinions or answers. Learned a lot.
                
                   I had Dr. Humphrey's for two graduate classes. He requires a lot of work. You will definitely have to punch on the keyboard some. With that being said, I took him with a 15 hour semester for my MBA and I managed fine, so its not insane but it is a lot. I definitely think he should be at a bigger and better school. He's a division 1 professor.
                
                   Very helpful and you can always reach him. Not much feedvack, but otherwise excellent and I would take again and will recommend to others. Amount of research is intense and extensive however, I finally learned something and applied to work life.
                
                   He is a very responsible professor
                
                   Dr. Humphreys is wonderful!  Challenging class, but the material is incredibly interesting and useful.  He will make you a better manager and person at the end of the class!  As others have said, there is a lot of writing, but you can do well without a 35 page paper.  I really look forward to taking his other classes!
                
                   Where is Dr O?  Ding dong, she is gone.  Smartest decision Texas A & M ever made.  Hopefully she realizes she was never meant to interact with people and she changes careers.  What a nightmare!
                
                   Where is Dr. O? We miss her so much. I was expecting to take her for my 527 course. She was a great prof for 501. Expectations are set from day 1. She is very fair in grading and gives a lot of feedback. One of the best profs at TAMU. 
                
                   Great Teacher; I learned quite a bit.  This was my first online course. She provided very clear directions and all I had to do to follow them!!
                
                   You will need to read ALL of the materials assigned (which can be difficult, as she assigns a lot of reading). This teacher is not easy, but if you study hard and follow instructions for the papers, you will do well. She is a fair grader.
                
                   Dr. O was somewhat difficult but very fair. She expects a lot and wants a student's best effort. Study, read, and know APA and students will be fine. If a student does not like STRUCTURE then this is not the professor for you. A student must keep on track in order to pass.
                
                   Dr. O was a great professor to take for my final course at TAMUC. She provided more detailed feedback on assignments and plenty of opportunities for chances to improve my grade as compared to my other professors. The course had quizzes, case studies, and career assignments. I wish that I had the opportunity to take her for other courses.
                
                   Dr. O was a breath of fresh air at TAMU. Other profs rarely give detailed feedback to their students. To the student that said she asked about your well-being- This is no surprise. She cares about her students, wants them to learn, and emphasizes work-family balance. To others, take her if you have the chance. You will learn and have no regrets.
                
                   Undoubtedly the best lecturer I have had so far at Texas A&M. Although she demands time and discipline from her students, she is genuinely interested in their improvement. She provides extensively feedback and she is constant with her promises. I am surprised and disapointed with so many negative feedback. She is the best. Thank you Dr. O!
                
                   Cannot believe this teacher is responsible for teaching an introductory management course. Great school, terrible teacher- find another one if you have to take this class.
                
                   She doesn't like questions that have been answer somewhere in the syllabus, so read it THOROUGHLY. She provides TONS of feedback on papers, and gives a few extra questions on quizzes as an opportunity for extra points. MUST do all assigned reading if expected to pass quizzes; MUST do APA citing EXACTLY. Took as summer course - 4 quizzes, 4 papers
                
                   The best professor in the College of Business at Texas A&M. Her expectations were clear from Day 1... no slackers allowed. Her course helped me to get a promotion and a significant raise. Kuddos Dr. O!
                
                   Worst professor I have ever encountered.  She is clearly a miserable person who hates teaching.  If you want your last semester to be awful then enroll in her class.  There is a reason why other sections fill up so quickly.
                
                   Get into her class only if u are there to learn something. You will have to work hard,  she gives proper feedback for the work submitted so you can always do better next time.
                
                   Class is very challenging. Listen to Classlives. They are very thorough  in what she wants in the case analysis. She is very picky. I took the class as an 8 week course and you will need to communicate with your team constantly to pass the course. Dr. O is willing to help you out so ask ask ask questions.
                
                   Oyler is a great instructor for those who really want to learn something.  She bends over backwards for those willing to do the work, and it is work!  Lots of work!
                
                   One of the absolutely worse teachers I've every had in college.  Arrogant and defensive when you question anything she doesn't understand, like strategy!  Why do some folks become teachers&#63;
                
                   she is the worst professor i have ever known. Stay away!!
                
                   Stay away! This professor is a know it all. For the case analysis, the alternative strategies are made up from the SWOT matrix. She crossed out my SW combo and put what she thought was the correct. H-e-l-l-o, my SW combo is correct because I am the one that thought of it. I really did use those SW combo to come up with the alternative strategy.
                
                   Dr. Oyler is the only professor that made me feel discouraged. She has a presence that makes you feel that you can not ask her questions. I don't know why she is teaching. If you have concerns with your grade even if your in the right, suck it up because she is very stubborn. Stay away! Find another professor.
                
                   I read some of the other posts & was a little worried.  I shouldn?t have been. It is manageable. The prof. gives great feedback & gave out the grading rubric before the assignment. Other professors should take some pointers from her. This is a final course & should require a little work. For those whining, somebody please call the WHAAAAmbulance.
                
                   I had no interest in taking this class and wasn't looking forward to it. Dr. ONeal changed all that the very first day. She is a top-notch instructor. I wouldn't think twice about taking another one of her classes.
                
                   she is bad teacher and not helpful, and her exam is difficult and essay questions and just one hour to answer 5 pages.
                
                   
                
                   It was hard to take a groups and teams class online, but the professor was very helpful and I learned how to work in a virtual team better.
                
                   Tough class but worth the effort.
                
                   I have never once gotten a B on a term paper or written assignment in college... until this guy. He gives instructions. When those instructions are followed and he gives a "B", he invites you to send him a message as to why the scoring was low. Then he copies and pastes the same cryptic message to everybody who responds. (My group compared notes)
                
                   He is a tough grader. No rubric so grading is subjective. Too many assignment for mini winter:  
                
                   This class has a huge final project that will take a ton of time to complete, but it's worth it.  The class is well taught.  The professor is very engaging and offers live virtual sessions throughout the semester.  He is there to answer questions, and his tests are fair.  Start working on the final paper early.  It's big!
                
                   Professor_Dr. Randolph-Seng was very helpful in the course and engaged the class. He used online sharing component which was a first. I did have an issue with his grading comments. Gist of comments from 1st paper was more references. Put more refs on 2nd paper. Then said more depth needed. Final paper did 30+ pages.. in depth content -got a B
                
                   Instructor's assignments (cases) are long but the cases provide a deeper understanding of the material. There are no exams, so students must do well on the cases and the discussion boards. Instructor is available to help and does not mind doing so.
                
                   Very strict with plagiarism, doesn't grade assignments even if plagiarism goes above 10%
                
                   This was the hardest class I've taken.  I must have read 100 papers and wrote 5 for the course.   I learned a lot.  You can learn so much from reading papers.   I'm exhausted.  I'm glad she pushed us.
                
                   WOULD RECOMMEND TO EVERYONE
                
                   no clarity in teaching and no direction in teaching. Diverts out of topic easily. Not a very convincing in clearing doubts. unreasonable reviews for case analysis. sends the same feedback to whole class. not specific. 
                
                   i took her class in spring . The worst professor of all. only B because of her in my whole management program. recommend not to take her class at all 
                
                   Worst Professor ever. Hard to understand what she says. Please prefer other professors and stay away from her.
                
                   the worst professor.. she just shouts in the class loud but doesnot explain the content .. lots of accent.
                
                   Worst Professr Ever. Only come twice live to teach students and asnswer questions. Not very clear on what she wants in the paper. I seriously didnot understand what she was saying the whole lecture time in both lectures that she had all semester long. Stay away from this professor if you can. If you cannot, get ready to study on your own.
                
                   Very bad, Never going to take any class. Don't recommend
                
                   Worse, don't take any class from  her.
                
                   Easy A.
                
                   Dr. Taneja is a great addition to the TAMU-C MBA program. With a wealth of professional and academic knowledge, she challenges students to think with a critical mindset. Dr. Taneja is very fair and is happy to help students who put forth a good effort. I highly recommend her as a professor.
                
                   A person commented “gives discussions boards and 2 homework”. This prof gave a lot of assignments.  Syllabus of this prof in 2011 (MKT501): 8 Diss Boards  Assign 1   Wrttn Indiv Project  Final Exam .  Assignment is so full, and no “homework”.  Why said “2 homework” . Please be honest when posting. The people trust your information & opinion.
                
                   This is my fourth class TAMUC by far the worst class. Prof. intersted in teaching APA manual which is okay but how about MKT? Prof. has several different deadlines and instructions all incoherent. As online student you try to learn core concept not figure out what she is trying to communicate, instead of having one clear. I did well but Stay away!!
                
                   This class is not very easy & the prof is not clear in her expectation of outcomes. She has a picture in mind but does not do a good job of explaining as there are no classes conducted & students are asked to self-study. Very strict on grading and high on expectations. Email communication is OK.
                
                   The only downfall for this class is the 20 minute final.  Have a major team project business plan, but I used BP Live onilne to help with financials.  Rewarding class
                
                   Real good Professor, with clear grading methodology. gives discussions boards and 2 homeworks. Gives good grades.
                
                   Worst professor in the department. She is very strict when it comes to grading. This would have been fine if she really teached and aswered our classmates questions correctly! All her answers to the questions posed in the class are completely wrong. She basically knows nothing but pretends that she knows everything! Total waste of my money & time.
                
                   This is the most useless professor in the department. She only uses three examples for the whole semester: (1) Bounty toilet paper, (2) shopping with her cousins at Costco, and (3) Apple iPhone. When we asked questions in the class related to the subject matter, her answers are completely unrelated boarderlining gibberish. Do not take her classes!
                
                   This is not a very easy class for a short semester, i'll definitely not recommend if you're working full time. A lot of time is required to be spent & prof makes sure you do so. Prof likes to focus more on references & API style notes/reviews rather than content of the work. Prof is very helpful but lacks teaching skills. i'd say she is 3 out of 5.
                
                   His class is easy, but he sure comes across as having a big head and being highly opinionated.  One gets tired of him talking on his soap box day after day.
                
                   Easy class, and Stauffer is funny.
                
                   Great professor - very thorough - study for tests
                
                   GI Joe, as I call him, was the nicest instructor on the planet, very helpful and really funny. I spent half the class laughing. The subject matter is a little boring if you are not into operations management, but he does make things more than interesting. Certaintly take this guy and joke with him.
                
                   Dr. Stauffer is clear and presise in his material and study guides. He went over the quantitative components three times for students and his office is always available for students in need. James will help if Dr. Stauffer is out and you gotta love James he's a hard worker.
                
                   The class is easy, but pretty boring.  And I'm not too sure how well he knows his stuff, especially the statistics portion of the course.
                
                   I have learned a lot of serious management material in his class
                
                   Good professor and researcher, very sociable.
                
                   His class was very easy although he caught some students cheating.  I think that it shall be useful for me as I hire employees for my new business.
                
                   Excellent professor.
                
                   Great management professor. Take his class anytime you get a chance.
                
                   Dr. Stauffer is a great guy and knows his stuff. Thought it was going to be a blow off class and at times it didn't seem like it would be, but he makes what he teaches simple and straight forward. Overall great guy with a great sense of humor. A must take
                
                   Yes he is a good HRM professor.  He knows what he is talking about.
                
                   Great HRM professor.
                
                   Top 10 professors in Business for good students.
                
                   Great Professor.
                
                   Joe Stauffer, is an excellent professor, I attended one of his classes and I am his GA.  Good stuff and world renown statistician (will be).  This rating system sucks.
                
                   Class is just starting but seems nice
                
                   No Comments
                
                    After reading professor Long Zhang's reviews I was hesitant to take his class. I thought maybe some of his previous students were over reacting about his confusing instructions, but unfortunately they were right. His instructions for assignments are all over the place and very vague. It is almost impossible to know exactly what he expects. 
                
                   This class requires a lot of work there are two case studies and the text book is a must read to pass the class.
                
                   Tests are easy with minimal studying. Writing assignments are more difficult. You can't half ass your way through them. There are six writing assignments and three tests. No extra credit. Weekly discussion boards for participation. He promptly returns emails. Be short and to the point In emails unless you speak Chinese. I enjoyed the class.
                
                   I would not recommend this professor. There is an obvious language barrier which makes it frustrating. His expectations are not clearly communicated and I had to wait to get a bad grade in order to get feedback for the next assignment. Again, I would never recommend taking this professor.
                
                   Very interesting subject. A problem was understanding exactly what the professor wanted. The language barrier clouded clarification. He knows the subject well, and I received a B, but I worked my tail off and asked many questions. Not a bad instructor at all if you can comprehend what he expects. 3 exams, 5 short papers, and discussion boards.
                
                   Course: Crisis Management. Dr. Long's English skills are lacking, which makes his exams difficult to understand. Added to this, his time limit on a 50 question/mult. choice test is no more than 60 minutes, so very few make good grades on his tests. His communication skills are too poor to be teaching at the MBA level. Avoid him.
                
                   Prof. Changchit is a great teacher! She explains everything so well and makes it easy to understand. She has step by step grading criteria on each assignment. There are only two tests and 8 assignments. The second test counts as the final. I recommend taking her for Computer Applications in Business
                
                   She is an awesome professor, if you have a chance to take her do it!!! She's gives excellent, thorough lectures and makes sure everyone in class knows what's going on. She also has a very good sense of humor. Exams cover everything she goes over in class so make sure to attend!!
                
                   Dr. Nikki was awesome! I learned so much in this class and loved it! Dr. Nikki was cheerful fun and VERY knowledgeable about the course material. She always teaches with a smile and takes her time to explain difficult concepts including helping students one on one.
                
                   Super easy class as long as you go and pay attention. And if you miss class she has slides online going over what was covered in class step by step. She doesn't accept late work but she always assigns the work about a week before its due. She repeats herself a lot so her accent isn't that confusing
                
                   Dr. Nikki is the best teacher i ever had. She is very helpful, kind and very patient. We don't need to buy the book, just come to the class, listen everything that she explained, practice and try to do every homework that she gave. Then A is in your hand. Best teacher.
                
                   I liked that I was able to learn new things about this class that were helpful in my accounting class this semester. Dr. Nikki did not only teach the course well, but she also taught other computer skills which are critical to every day computer used.Great teacher, thanks for making my learning experience easier!
                
                   I liked the fact that I was able to learn new things about this class that were helpful in my accounting class this semester. Dr. Nikki did not only teach the course well, but she also taught other computer skills which are critical to every day computer used.Great teacher, thanks for making my learning experience easier!
                
                   Pretty easy if attend class. Her accent can make it difficult for you to understand her but if you sit in the front, it shouldn't be too bad. She goes kinda fast so make sure you pay attention or you will get lost. Tests are pretty easy, if you study in-class work and outside assignments.
                
                   Easy class if you go you learn so many cool things you can use in the future about excel. Test you get to use a cheat sheet front and back so that helps...easy A and Nikki is so funny with her accent! floppy disk sounds like...well u know with an asian accent LOL!
                
                   Nikki is a nice teacher. Her knowledge about computer is outstanding. Moreover, she is always ready to help students. This class is easy to get A if you come to class frequently and take note carefully.
                
                   Nikki is a great professor, a little bit tough but great.  She will do whatever possible to help you if you show to her that you help yourself first and you spend your best effort to learn in the class. Class is not easy, I am not good with computers, but I learn a lot.
                
                   She is a great professor. If you attend class you will do well. She is very organized with her assignments and grades fairly. She is also available if you have questions and explains them clearly. Work hard and you might not have to take the final!
                
                   Great professor. Will help you to pass class. Would recommend to anyone who needs this class.
                
                   Great teacher...a little hard to understand but it's really not that bad. She's very willing to help and answer questions. It's not a super easy class but if you attend class and follow along with her it's not that hard to get an A.
                
                   She is a little bit tough, but great! Always willing to help students.
                
                   Difficult to understand at first but you'll get used to her accent later on. She's really helpful even before an exam or when an assignment is due. She's very clever and actually quite funny with all the students in her class. But you have to attend her class to understand everything. Unless you're amazing at excel or access to begin with. :P
                
                   Can't stand slackers, or for that matter normal, underachieving Americans. Tough teacher, quite demanding, but a grade can be pulled off. Just seem interested and focused and she won't pick on you.
                
                   Very hard to understand!!! does not speak english well!!!
                
                   A great techer and always willing to help. very interesting classes; not boring. lots of fum computer excel/access hwk that makes an A an easy obtainable goal
                
                   Hard to understand, and a little demanding in course work, but an excellent professor who can really teach you a lot about computers.
                
                   Easy course, reading is required. He is very easy to get a hold of when stuck on assignments.  Overall no problems with class or professor
                
                   Dr. Klaus was awesome. He provides the best study guides I've had in my college career. They're simple, relevant, and really allow students to learn the material. His tests are straightforward, as his is course organization. I would definitely take him again if I need another MISY course. Great guy!
                
                   I really enjoyed his class. It was set up as 50/50 inclass/online. We only went to class 1 day out of the week, and other half was lone. I'm horrible at online classes, but he sets up his online section very easy, and isn't overwhelming. He does give test reviews, but they don't tell you EVERYTHING that will be on the test. I really enjoyed him.
                
                   OMG, I took this class online and one of the hardest classes I had to take.  Not so much in complication, but just the work load is overwhelming. Quizzes, projects, discussions, disscussion questions for homework.  Gives reviews for exams, grades fairly but a lot of work.  Always willing to help-uses the book a lot.
                
                   Took an online class. As expected, homework each week, it is easy, although time consuming. There was a big final semester project at the end due which was about 15 pages long. However, she gives the instructions way ahead before its due. Deadlines are very important here. If you do your part, you will get the desired grade.
                
                   EXCELLENT professor. Very clear assignments and readings. Although there is a lot of work, it is easy if you go to class, and Myers is more than willing to help if you ask. All around great professor, very respectful. I'd take Myers over Blanco ANY day. Class presentations aren't so bad if you follow the work assigned. 
                
                   You have to go to class. There is a lot of work, but it's not difficult. I think this class should be mandatory for all majors because you learn how to communicate properly. Dr. Myers is a good teacher, communicates well and makes everything very clear.
                
                   You need to actually go to class everyday for this one. He gives daily assignments and takes attendance. He's a really nice guy though and is always very willing to help if you ask! The work isn't too hard; it's just learning letter and report styles. There are 2 presentations which aren't hard at all because he gives you the material to present.
                
                   Dude's soooo boring, he has like a monotone voice. but, he is a good and fair instructor with good manners. He has a lot of homework n very very boring lectures
                
                   Very bad teacher, acts like everyone is in pre-K and talks down to them.  Also VERY anal about homework, projects, and deadlines.  No style of teaching, just expects you to read the book and figure it out...his job is &quot;highlighting&quot; the important topics.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's a little boring, but a very nice guy- very helpful too! He's very understanding; if you have to miss class or a test or a presentation, he always lets you do it late or make it up!
                
                   Very soft spoken nice guy.  Explains things well and gives you lots of practice in class.  Test are well thought out and gone over.  Not too much homework and one or two presentations.  Works well with athletes and grades fairly.  Kinda boring.
                
                   Hard to get a hold of and sometimes contradicts her assignments.  Be prepared for lots of assignments online
                
                   Class was easy so as long as you are willing to put in the work
                
                   Hard class, she gave very low grade on essay, which pull my grades down. Don't take her class!
                
                   Very hard to get ahold of, syllabus said one thing,she was doing something else. was more focused on APA style than on MGMT. one wrong citation with your paper will get you a ZERO with no chance for changing it.I would not recommend taking any course from her.
                
                   Don't take this teacher for anything. I wouldn't want her to teach me to tie my shoe!!!!!
                
                   Online class. First off the SWOT paper you have to do is ridiculous. Don't follow the guidelines otherwise you'll fail the paper. She doesnt know how to respond to a email period end of story. I finally gave up on the class all together Google searched the questions and found all the answers online to the test and quizzes.Learned more that way. RUN
                
                   I took the online class. Dr. Peeples was very prompt in answering questions and was true to her hrs of availability. I contacted her several times via phone to discuss textbook material and enjoyed the conversations.  I found the textbook to be relevant to the &quot;real world&quot; of management.
                
                   Peeple's is very knowledgeable and I learned from her alot by whats she teaches in the book. for that shes a great teacher, is grading and projects that I say stay away from her. Very harsh grading grades on a whim no grading guidelines for points taken off of anything.
                
                   Lots and lots of work, high demands, syllabus unclear and ambiguous.
                
                   Very confusing as far as guidelines given (it seemed hardly any students knew what was going on) and emails about questions were poorly answered. The instructions said one thing while she said another. The class itself wasn't difficult but unless you're a mind reader, be careful.
                
                   She puts you with a group to do group projects and assignments that effect overall grade.
                
                   Her rules are set in stone so there are no changes in referece to emergencies so if a member of the family dies you better be thiking on droping out of school if you miss a day in class
                
                   One of the lowest level courses, and HARDEST I've ever taken at TAMUCC! Horrible teacher who is entirely too old and kranky and talks down to her students.  Smart lady but very bad teacher.  Very anal when it comes to grading, projects, and deadlines!
                
                   she is really nice and pretty easy, but DO NOT be late to class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I found Mr. Stoops to be a relatively boring professor. I took his course in the summer, so we had class four days a week. He gave very good reviews for his multiple-choice tests. The reviews consisted of 50 statements; all you had to do was find the statement in his PowerPoint slides and you'd have the answer! He allowed a note sheet during tests.
                
                   The best professor I have EVER had. Lectures aren't the most "interesting" but def helps when it comes to tests. Gives extra credit, and I suggest doing them, as his tests are somewhat difficult. Easy-going, respectful, all around great professor. Would DEF take this professor again. Doesn't grade for attendance, but going regularly is beneficial 
                
                   You will not pass unless you think like she does, believes like she does or talks like she does. She never makes sense. She is very full of herself. She is degrading to everyone - yells a lot. Even cries because she doesn't understand no one likes her. Doh!!  Help?? What help?? Very arrogant. Do not take classes with her if you don't have to
                
                   You just need to approach her for help.  If you are an HR major she will love you.  Otherwise, make the first move and go to her.  She appreciates knowing that she has helped you!
                
                   Enjoys insulting the classes intelligence. Hates men, and thinks the world of Affirmative action
                
                   No book really needed or attendance to class. Use book from library and powerpoint and you will be fine.
                
                   Dr. Franklin is the worst professor I have ever had. The class average for Exam 1 was a 52 AFTER THE CURVE! He is disrespectful to students, the exams are over nothing he covered in lecture or the book, and does not care about anything you have to say. Stay away from him and his classes. Take them in college station if possible!
                
                   She does in fact grade the group paper like a mad English professor...looking more for grammar errors rather than content. BEWARE!!  Group projects online stink and I would not recommend this teacher.
                
                   Took Online- Class is fairly easy requires book reading short videos and quizzes every other week and a test about each month. Only challenging part was the group paper- 1. group things online are HARD. 2. She grades like a demon. Does let you attempt to fix your mistakes but good luck. Counts as a huge part of grade and she is TOUGH on it!
                
                   Great instructor. Learned alot. Test were OK
                
                   Very motivational.  She's one of the few you will remember years down the road. Rewards &quot;outside the box&quot; thinking.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   It is very important that you attend every class. Dr. Liu is a great professor that makes sure no student stays behind. Those who do, are by choice. You are expected to study if you want to pass her class. Most students just want to cruise through the course. Not here. If you don't study the material she presents, you'll regret it during the test.
                
                   Great professor.  very supportive.  interested in your success.  class is tough but she makes it doable.  always there for you if you need help.  she is funny too.
                
                   She is a great teacher and I wish she would tach other classes. If you have a question she is there for you. Gives you all the tools to get a good grade. She is very organized and fair. 
                
                   The class was really easy, she makes sure you are prepared for the quizzes and tests. There was one quiz at the end of each chapter but you have 2 chances to score higher. She gives lots of extra credit opportunities. I took the 5 week summer class and it was great. I would take other classes with her.
                
                   Online quiz after each chaptersubject. But you can retake a quiz three times. Midterm and final weigh 50% of grade - not easy, so study!  Hybrid class, so you can re-watch the lecture if you missed something. One project worth 10%.  Gives extra credit opportunities. I would take her again.
                
                   Online quiz after each chapter. However, you can retake the quizzes three times. Midterm and final exams are not easy and weigh 50% of your grade. So you need to study. One project paper.  It's a hybrid class so you can re-watch the class if you missed something. Good at responding to emails.  I would take her again.
                
                   Teacher has a strong accent, so she recorded the class so we can go back and take a look at. Tests are hard, quizzes and reviews get harder and some end up having nothing to do with the exam, or she asks questions that she hasnt teached. She gives you 3 retakes on quizzes take advantage of! She gives extra credit do them!!
                
                   she is very sweet and has a great attitude.  her quizzes get harder as the semester progresses. she gives you 3 times to take the quizzes, which is very helpful. she offers a place to get tutoring if needed. there is always extra credit offered during the semester. 
                
                   The course was difficult but this is mentioned no less than 50 times up front. The tests are extremely difficult (this coming from someone who enjoys math and statistics) so be prepared to read the chapters, listen in class and ask questions when you have them. Shes very helpful but only if you ask. I enjoyed her enthusiasm and bright attitude. I 
                
                   This is a difficult course, but Dr. Liu's knowledge and willingness make my study much easier and more effective. Unlike other graduate courses, this one felt much more like a graduate level course that one would find at other schools, and I think students should be thankful for that since it would not happen at all in our school. 
                
                   It is not fair to say that Dr. Liu is the worst professor. Yes, her class is difficult, but as long as you work hard, you can still pass. Our school set up no requirements for the MBA program You apply; you get in. A lot of us come in with no quantitative knowledge or background. She has provided tons of bonus opportunities. When you do not want t
                
                   AVOID this teacher for MGMT 5325. Wait for the other professor.  She is hand down the worse teacher I have ever had. She tries to confuse you by jumping around the chapters. Just read the book. This teacher does not provide clarification and you will be left with many unanswered questions, that you are expected to learn through osmosis. 
                
                   Dr. Liu is AWESOME and so funny. She does have a little Chinese accent but she is a phenomenal teacher. She is very clear with the concepts, ALWAYS there to help, and gives plenty of bonus opportunities. Attendance is not mandatory but is extra credit so if you don't go you cost yourself valuable points. I would take her again in a heartbeat! 
                
                   Great prof to take Quantitative with. Always works out all problems with the class and is not afraid of having students ask questions and addressing them in class. Offers bonuses which can actually add 3-5% to your final grade! Just make sure you do them through out the semester. 
                
                   I took the hyflex course in Spring 2014 and did 100% online. It is absolutely necessary to watch every lecture video before beginning the quizzes. There is one project assignment but if you watch the project lecture video then their should be no reason you don't get an A. She gives you plenty of bonus opportunities.
                
                   Hyflex course was easy. Instructor has a sense of humor! She explains lessons very well. Provides 3 opportunities to pass chapter quizzes. Provides lots of extra credit. Chapter reviews and Powerpoint presentations are all you need to pass this class.
                
                   Some of the topics are hard. It is Bus Math. She offers help, and 3 chances on the quiz. She creates a study guide for the Exams. You need to attend each class or you will miss out on class notes. You do need to study to do good.
                
                   You already know going in to class that the course is challenging. You have to study, but she gives you all the help in the world. 3 Chances to pass a quiz? What more could she do to help you? Extra credit for attendance, as long as you pay attention, and study, you're fine.
                
                   Statistics is not an easy course. Dr. Liu was very good at explaining concepts and provided clarification when asked. Lots of extra credit opportunities. Recommend - if you're focused.
                
                   She is a little difficult to understand at first. Very helpful in helping you comprehend the problems. She gives extra credit opportunities and is willing to stay after class or you can call her if you need any help!! Good teacher.
                
                   Overall a good professor.  Classes were informative but do not expect to hear back from him in a reasonable timeframe if you hear back at all.  Asked numerous times for clarification on a few assignments and never heard back as well as final grades shown as "incomplete" & finally had to involve other departs to get results.  Expect many long papers
                
                   Great class!
                
                   Outstanding professor. Very articulate, helpful, and helps every student. His classess are very entertaining and professional. Do not join this class if you dont have a senses of humor. You will learn and have fun at the same time. He has been my favorite professor of ALL TIME! And he helps every student and does not let anyone fall behind.5 STARS!
                
                   Great Guy!!! the only thing oyu need to worry are his exams!
                
                   Here is an honest rating. Dr. Miles class is fun. He is very funny although his comments are a bit sexually inappropriate. His class assignments are easy and fun. That being said 60% of your grade is based off the textbook which he does not spend alot of time on. The reviews are useless. The tests are very specific. This is not an easy class.
                
                   I took his class online, it was very easy if you do the readings, check announcements and try to figure out answers to questions before asking. He is busy and not tolerant of questions that students can easily figure out themselves if they would just try. My advice is ask other students first before the professor. He gives plenty of extra credit
                
                   Took Prof Miles in an online class. His emails were blunt & to the point, no personality through email & sometimes rude. Finally met in person & couldn't believe it was the same prof, he was polite. Tests are extremely picky (be sure to read betwn the lines when reading the book). Had to challenge final grade, so keep track of your own grades.
                
                   I don't know what there other people are talking about. I actually had him in the classroom and Dr. Miles is the best professor I have had to date. He is calm, professional, motivated, and extremely helpful.  Dr. Miles is blunt and to the point, so, over email more &quot;sensitive&quot; individuals may mis-interpert, but he really is a nice guy. Get a grip!
                
                   OK, this professor is so RUDE, I had it online and his response was to figure out your self..I will not recommend this professor at all, AVOID..He is very unprofessional on his responses. GOOD Luck if you decide to take this class...
                
                   I took online course. He is not helpful. Unclear with his instructions and assigmnets. He does grade his assignments very easily though. Test are extremely hard. Technically no study guides. He gives you the chapter outline for a study guide. He expects you to read about 4 chapters and then take a test. Do not reccommend him & will not take course.
                
                   Where to start, let me 1st say had Dr Miles for an online class. I can honestly say he is the worst professor I have ever had. Failed all exams, & hes useless if u have a &#63;. very rude to students. Don?t bother texting him like his syllabus states, chances are you will get no reply. I would not recommend him to anyone nor would I take him again.
                
                   
                
                   Only took this class because it was required. Dr. Sosa-Fey knows her stuff and creates a fun and relaxing learning environment. The biggest challenge is the 20 paper. As long as you don't wait until the last minute you will be fine.
                
                   Great instructor! She was very helpful and always available to answer questions. She is organized and prepared with her readings and prep exam questions. She outlines the course in great detail, so there are no surprises. She does require a 20 page paper, but pick a topic you will like and you will do great.
                
                   Great instructor.  Very helpful.  Always available to answer questions.  Only downfall is she is head of mba so email response may be slow.
                
                   Class itself was more like an overview of undergrad level courses.  However, the professor does help recap & clear concepts.  Genuinely cares about the success of his students.  The most challenging part is the term paper which needs to be up to 20 pages long.  If you don't mind that, an A is yours!
                
                   Took this class in the summer it was alot of material very fast. You get assigned a partner and you had to teach the class a chapter she gives you the powerpoint. There 2 chapters a day. You have to write 8 Q's for your ch post it on BB, unless you ask the person that created the Q's you won't ever get the ans. so COLLABORATE 2 pass test r hard!
                
                   I would suggest to read your book like bible reading. You will learn more from the book you use. Go to class she does take attendance and this will help you for your final grade. GOOD LUCK!!!!
                
                   You will learn a lot!
                
                   BORING.  I was so bored in this class I'd fall asleep and still suffered from boredom!  Easy A though.
                
                   Mrs. Wingert was pretty easy going and if we had questions she would answer in a timely manner. she doesn't take attendance either. had weekly quizzes and 4 papers. not too hard, I would take her again. 
                
                   Took this prof for Labor Relations. You have 5 quizzes that are straight from the book, a midterm, a group project, and a final. The project is pretty fun once you figure out what you are supposed to do. The exam and midterms come straight from the quizzes.
                
                   You won't find a better professor. Cares about teaching and cares about each of his "customers" (he respects the time and money you spend for your education and he treats you as a customer wants to be treated!). I learned much from him, especially his real-world experience.
                
                   Great teacher, has an unorthodox approach to teaching. Values his students as "customers" & ensures we get value from his classes. Has real world perspective & welcomes input from students during class & on certain assignment requirements. I'd advice anyone to take his class & have no criticism of him
                
                   Heard good things about professor.  Took this course and they're true. Enthusiatic, fair and uses industry experience to offer great advice.
                
                   Take this guy. Enthusiastic and real world.
                
                   This is my third course with Ferrero. Capstone has lots of requirements but well organized and presented. He really cares about students and he knows his stuff.
                
                   Delivers valuable business insight and respects students.
                
                   Ferrero is not easy but is very fair. Has real world experience, a big difference over others. Treats you like a customer not a student. Enjoys teaching and it shows.
                
                   This teacher is listed on a list of classes to take for easiness and good classes. She teaches Inter. Econ. and princ. of mngmt.
                
                   His tests were non-proctored and could be taken at home, but that doesn't mean they're easy.  He counts attendance, and that's the only reason I went to class. He lectures off of the PP which mirrors the book. He is a very nice teacher, and knows his stuff. I would take him again. There was a 10 pg paper and a journal for each chapter.
                
                   Get ready to read, you have to do two papers and four exam, exam are tough, but I would not so worry about them more on attendance and participation.
                
                   Fairly Easy- Test are online. 2 written assignments
                
                   All quizs and test are nonproctered online.
                
                   Principles of management was super easy with Dr. Fry. Do the work and you will have an A.
                
                   A lot of people think Dr. Fry is not helpful. However, he was extremely helpful to me. I was having a lot personal problems at home. I emailed Dr. Fry telling him I might drop his class because I wasn't doing well. He gave me an advice and I took it. I ended up doing well in his class and got a B. Word of advice read your book thoroughly.
                
                   Hard grade, completed all assignments, made good points on test and still received a C. Go elsewhere
                
                   Will never take again. Talks about himself and where he went to school (Ohio State) and how great that school is every class. Class period spent doing exercises from chapters already tested for. In class is complete waste of time. Just awful personality.
                
                   Time in class is wasted. Usually spent doing exercises out of the book and in a chapter that you have been tested on already. Class discussions are like a guessing game with no right answer. He really likes himself and spends a lot of time telling you about all he has done all the way back to high school.
                
                   Dr. Fry's class is easy only if you read the book. You can get an easy A if you actually put an effort in the class.
                
                   Online class is really easy. The only graded assignments are 4 exams (which are easy, straight from text book) and 2 projects. He responds quickly to emails. Seems like a pretty nice guy.
                
                   CURRENTLY TAKING HIS CLASS ONLINE. BEFORE SIGNING UP FOR HIS COURSE I WAS TERRIFIED BC OF THE PREVIOUS COMMENTS, BUT IT'S NOT BAD AT ALL. THE COURSE IS SELF EXPLANATORY, WEEKLY ASSIGNMENTS, EXAMS ARE FROM THE BOOK, IF YOU MAKE AN EFFORT AND READ YOU WILL DO JUST FINE!
                
                   Two Words: Drop...now...
                
                   Holds you accountable for reading the material. If you DO read the material, you will find the powerpoint slides are directly from the book. Once you figure out the format he wants the work done in, you should be successful. Is always available to help during his office hours. He is not one of those teachers who will just pass you for showing up.
                
                   Holds you responsible for reading the material. If you read the book, you will notice that the powerpoint slides he is using are straight from the book. Once you figure out the format he wants the work to be done in, you should be able to succeed with at least a B. Slack off and don't read the material and you will be miserable.
                
                   Good Luck, he only showed power point slides and a few videos.  Was not helpful and got an attitude regarding questions about the mngt. portfolio.  Rude and difficult.  You basically are on your own.  Got a B cause I bust my butt learning the materials on my own.
                
                   Do not ever take him, doesnt know what he is talking about. HE could care less about your grade or you doing well in his class, but he can talk about going on vacation.
                
                   Would never take another course with him again. Teaches from Power Point slides only. Hard to follow. Hard to get a textbook answer out of him. Has no problem screaming and yelling when the material is not understood. Arrives on time but likes to leave early, but still reguires you to understand the complete section or the lesson of the day.
                
                   I took this class online as an 8-week course. If you have other classes on top of this one, I wouldn't recommend it. She is very nice & accepts late work, but it is a lot of assignments! A total of 57, on top of chapter readings, slides, videos, & supplemental articles. The tests are based from the videos & articles. The book won't help w/ tests.
                
                   She's very energetic and a great teacher.  I took her for the 8wk session. There were 3 short communications, an individual reportpresentation and a group paper due towards the end of the semester. The quizzes and test were fairly easy. The class itself was fairly easy and as long as you show effort you will pass. I received an A.
                
                   If you do the required assignments, you will pass the class! There were no exams but you do have a management portfolio that is worth 340 points (you have all semester to complete it!) The rest of your grade consists of weekly chapter quizzes and journals, BB discussions, and 4 supplemental quizzes. Very straightforward. Prof. Luciano is very nice!
                
                   Took this class online. There was only 4 exams worth 125 points each. There was one project that you worked on for about 5 1/2 weeks worth 250 points. There was also a journal comprised of 5 case studies that you worked on during the 8 week course. You really only know how  you are doing on the exams. Would much rather get points back asap!
                
                   Really cares about her students and her community.  Will go out of her way to be of assistance in class or out of class.  Sincere instructor who practices what she preaches.
                
                   Must answer questions at end of each chapter. Easy tests come from book. Lectures are helpful. She's easy to follow. Motivational speaker.
                
                   He's pretty funny and makes the class a little more interesting. The tests are all multiple choice.. must read the book though. One group presentation/essay to turn in and gives pop quizzes for extra points on tests. Other than that.. its all lecture.
                
                   Awesome teacher. Quizes and test were all online and allowed enough time to be taken. Open book test allowed. The hardest part of the whole class was her APA essays which you do about 5 the whole semester but they were 500 words or less, so not difficult if you do the work. Teacher will work with you if there is any issues. Would take again.
                
                   Expects and appreciates quality work from graduate students. Flexible with student needs. Not the best orator but makes the point. I especially appreciated her depth of experience outside the academic world.
                
                   Very easy grader and gives extra credit for thoose who need it, but her test are extremly easy a 4th grade could pass take her.
                
                   Extremely great professor. She will work with you. Very very helpful. She is a huge student advocate! If you can register for her class do it.
                
                   Her test are very easy if you study her review you should make at least a 80 if not better. she does a lot of group work and expect all you to get together and its a big part of your grade.
                
                   He posts a lot of online lectures to help you understand the material. The majority of my grade was based on the quizzes and exams from the lab.
                
                   I took his online class.  About 38 assignments i think . 4 exams. Which all comes from Hawkes. At the end of the class there will be  an end of semester assessment that is timed. Everything was fine except the assessment it was stupid.  Just don't get behind on the assignments or it will overwhelm you at the end of the semester. 
                
                   I would have never expected to actually enjoy statistics. Dr. Almond's lectures are awesome and easy to understand. I highly recommend using them ... it made the homework and tests so much easier. You've got to work for the grade but I felt like I actually understood and grasped the material because Dr. Almond did such a good job presenting it.
                
                   Dr Almond is a great teacher and provides everything you'll need to get an A. You will not need to buy the textbook. Watch his lectures as they explain everything. He also walks through problems straight from Hawkes. Finally, he provides calculators that will make your life easier, especially later in the course.
                
                   Good Teacher, and gives good lectures! Easy if you actually see every lecture!! 
                
                   Business stats sounded scary, but Dr. Almond made it extremely easy. He is helpful and breaks things down until you grasp the concept. Definitely recommend taking him.
                
                   Business statistics is a hard subject but Dr. Almond really does the best teaching this course if you apply yourself there's no reason why you can't get an A for this class even if you have no idea about statistics. If you have to take this class I highly recommend Dr. Almond.
                
                   Great professor would take him again, weekly journal entries due, group project with presentation. Please choose your groups wisely or you will be stressed out.
                
                   Dr. Almond is very clear about his expectations.  Work in a group to do the final presentation and paper.  I had a great group.  He has good presentations that are interesting and sometimes funny.  He probably has the best personality at this university.
                
                   He's very helpful. I took this in class. I should've taken it online. Not because his class is boring.. This professor is so good that I would highly recommend him to take it online. I learn from his class but math is not really my strong side. So, I have the tendency to forget things. It really helps me to look at his lessons online.
                
                   This is great class,he is a very helpful teacher and helps you with the calculations!
                
                   Statistics are never going to get easier to understand than in his class. He's an excellent teacher and extremely patient and helpful. I wish he taught all my courses. I never even had to open my textbook. If you don't get it in his class, you're never going to get it. BEST ON CAMPUS! (It doesn't hurt that he has an awesome personality.)
                
                   His lectures are great.  Easy to understand.  Material is a little hard, but he makes them easy to figure out.  He responds to emails promptly.
                
                   His lectures were very helpful and easy to understand.  Make sure to use his excel calculators because they make it so much easier.
                
                   His lectures were very good and easy to understand.  Make sure you use his excel calculators because they will help you a ton.
                
                   Very good instructor! I recommend taking his courses face-to-face. He grades fair and gives good feedback for improvements. He expects nothing from the best of you. Research papers and journals will be expected of you.
                
                   Great Professor! Teaches with passion. He demands the best from his students. I recommend taking his classes face-to-face. Books are a must for his class. Grades fair and gives back good feedback for improvements.
                
                   The way he sets up his online class is great. I actually found that I had fun doing the work. He provides excel worksheets to do the formulas for you. All you have to know is what information is what and where to put it. I was dreading this class going into it and really enjoyed it.Drops your 5 lowest homework grades.
                
                   Straight and to the point - high expectations.  Gives fair and honest feedback.  Senior Capstone wasn't easy, but was relevant.  Would definitely recommend.
                
                   Good motivated teacher. Take this class if you want to learn about statistics.  Take Simmons if you want to he taught to pass the class. Class sucked for me because I can't stands statistics.
                
                   Dr. Waggoner is has a lot of knowledge with anything Human Resources. Her lectures are nice to listen to. Clear grading expectations, just do what the rubric says and you will pass. OK to miss class as it is easy to catch up
                
                   He is very clear and manages time well. He usually condenses the material into what is important and what will be on the test.
                
                   Explains everything well but tests are super hard. You need to try to cram all your notes on to allowed cheat sheet . Test are extremely tricky and misleading at times.  Grades harshly and does NOT curve.  Homework is super easy but you have a book analysis to write.  STUDY STUDY!
                
                   Teacher is great! Test are essay but as long as you study for them they are easy. Has simple assignments every week. Overall great class. Teacher knows what he is talking about and very approachable.
                
                   Loved this class.  Very informative.  REally enjoy this professor
                
                   Learned a lot.  This is my 2nd class with this professor :)
                
                   Loved this professor.  Will take him again!
                
                   Everything is great, except the grading!! You might not get a good grade but you do learn with this guy, need to study and learn the material to pass.
                
                   INSTRUCTOR SHOULD BE NOMINATED FOR AWARD. REALLY BRINGS THE REAL WORLD TO THE CLASSROOM. IF YOU STUDY HARD YOU CAN PASS. FAVORITE INSTRUCTOR THIS SEMESTER!
                
                   great instructor!! One of the few good ones TAMUSA has to offer.
                
                   I took his class this summer.  He is a great professor.  If you attend class and participate, you are sure to receive an A.
                
                   Easy class, tough tests...but he curves! Every test was tricky, so be sure you understand the material. Each test took the entire class time to take, so be sure to study! Easy &quot;A&quot; if you do all that is required and attend class!
                
                   
                
                   did not really care for this professor at all.  you ask for help and you leave more confused than when you walked in.  does not really grade fairly.  tells you that you did not include stuff in the assignment when it is in the first 2 paragraphs, etc.  had him for more than one class and all were like that.  not a good profess in my opinion
                
                   Love this professor. 
                
                   Dr. Guardia frequently explains homework or some project in most of lectures as well as shows videos instead of lecturing. I feel it's to waste time until class is over. He has a lot of real world experience that he does share with the class. Don't expect your grades backs quickly on anything written.
                
                   Prof. Guardia was very sweet and helpful. The quizzes and assignments aren't too hard you just have to remember to do them. His lectures get a little dry though.
                
                   I took his hyflex class for fall 2014. The quizzes are easy but the challenge for me was the RA assignments and the group project. He's very confusing and his lectures are boring! He does NOT offer extra credit or allow you to make up the RA assignments. Make sure you do them! Overall i'd take him again.
                
                   Great Professor, I learned a lot. He gives great lectures and his grading is very clear.
                
                   Dr. Guardia is very helpful and knowledgeable. The group project is challenging to start but once you start to understand it, it is not that hard. The last quiz is a little tricky. Print out your slides.
                
                   I took this class hyflex in Spring 2014 and I did 100% online. I wish I would have watched the lecture videos, I would have received an A. There are only 4 HW assignments and 7-8 quizzes as well as 1 major team project. DO NOT PROCRASTINATE! Overall easy, I'd take another course by him. He does take a LONG time to grade HW which is a bummer.
                
                   No midterm or final. 7 or 8 chapter quizzes throughout the semester. Timed but open book. Team project is easy but you know how that goes. People are sometimes unresponsive or won't do anything want to be leaches. Lectures are informative especially if HR is what you are doing and like. Overall good easy class. Recommend the hyflex bc of easiness.
                
                   Great class, I learned a great deal.
                
                   not very giving.  solely goes by the book not practical experience.  very cut and dry... monitoned.. goes off of ppt and rarely elaborates..
                
                   Likes to go off tangent, but has real world experience.  Easy going, but make sure you don't slack off for his team assignment!
                
                   Teacher is very approachable. Knows his stuff. Always willing to help. Class is semi-easy. Seems like a lot of work but very manageable.
                
                   Prof. Horne is awesome!! The project was related to my job and helped me look good to my boss. I learned things that I can use at work every day. Yeah, I had to work hard but that's why it's called GRADUATE school!
                
                   Dr. Horne was a tough professor who made sure you learned something.  The class was hard but it was one of the best I had.
                
                   This professor is arrogant, in my opinion.  She truly thinks she is the smartest person in the room.  I just can?t believe a professor like her is allowed to teach grad level classes.  She can come off as degrading.  Her exams are supposedly easy if you know the material.  I knew the material, but?! Stay away from her if you can!
                
                   lots of work and she thinks shes better than everyone because shes getting her doctorate.  nasty attitude
                
                   Prof Horne is not a difficult professor however a lot of class time is spent on random discussion that does not feel related to the material.  She sometimes seems disorganized.  She is however, definitely interested in her students passing the class and gives opportunity for extra credit and help whenever requested.
                
                   Hes a great prof. but kinda tuff
                
                   I didn't go to class. Pretty boring. It's basically just high school government class again. She gets off topic easily and is kind of argumentative.   She will not answer any emails or attempt at communication. No matter how formal or nice you are to her. 0 reason to go to class. Tests online.  I think she rounded my grade from 81% to an A.
                
                   I am truly deeply saddened by this educator. She has ultimately destroyed my hope for the future. She has single-handedly ruined my life. She refuses to increase my GPA allowing me to register for classes. This means that the only thing I can do is repeat the course by itself. I am currently missing out on the chance of taking 5 other courses.
                
                   The worst teacher I have ever had in my life. Just her first semester and she gets 100 students. Who decides this? Waste of time, energy, efforts and money. Do not even try. If you are taking her, just drop her now and take the class with someone else or next semester, because that is what you will most likely end up doing anyway.
                
                   The worst professor throughout my college career. Avoid taking her. She is the odd person out. She is responsible for 100 business students, taking a prerequisite, graduation requirement course. I wonder how these 100 students will do. Do not take her. Had I known she was this bad, I would have not taken her.
                
                   Worst professor throughout my college career. Avoid taking her. She is the odd person out. She is responsible for 100 business students, taking a prerequisite, graduation requirement course. I wonder how these 100 students will do. 
                
                   Very tough. Responsible for 100 students taking a 5 major business prereq. New teacher, transferred in from Texas, very unfortunate. No help here. Must score high and finish early.
                
                   She seems like she knows nothing about marketing,  all she can do is read off power points.  Lots of easy assignments and group projects, but you'll have no idea what the assignment is about. Power points are online which us good but it will barely help on tests. Tests are more situationally based and not about definitions, class average was a 66.
                
                   Great teacher! She was an undeniable asset to the MARA program, will be missed by all those who matter - The student body.
                
                   Mrs. Alexander was great.  I preferred her finance class over her management class.  Don't think it had anything to do with her, I'm just a numbers type of guy.  Management bores me.  It's the same across all classes.  I wish she would teach Strategic Management.  She would do a much better job than Dr. Weeks.
                
                   Alexander is personable and  shares tidbits about her life. She is really good for FINC 341, MARA 363 and MARA 440. If she talks about Healthcare legislation - students better listen - this is not about politics. She has helped many students obtain jobs after graduation and exhibits a genuine caring for those who are respectful and try.
                
                   Nice lady. Made an A. Easy class. Survey of business cliche 101.
                
                   You have to try in this class. She will work with you if you actually pay attention, ask questions and read the book. Great professor!
                
                   This class was not easy because you have to TRY! if you try hard and you seek her help, she WILL help you. She is a great professor but she does not put up with laziness. Definitely tough love but sometimes is necessary in order for us to learn. If you want to pass READ THE BOOK! Best professor ever!<3
                
                   Please don't take her class. I should of paid attention to the comments here and from the experiences others have told me.
                
                   She is very theoretical. Not a good thing when you are in a graduate class and try to actually learn something.
                
                   Middleton was the most hateful, rude instructor I had while working on my degree. Her instructions are clear as mud until AFTER you complete the project and she rips you a new one for not reading her mind. She works hard to get group members fighting with each other. She will accuse you of cheating if you do a good job. Avoid her like the plague.
                
                   Prepare to be drilled during the presentations!!!!!!!  Get on her good side or else you will fail because of favortism.  She knows nothing about accounting so be prepared to argue that your ratios are right.  The only thing good is she will give a curve at the end of the semester.
                
                   This woman is very evil!!!!!!! The will make your life a living hell. Be prepared to have no life for the whole semester. If you ask her question it will make her mad. Be careful and take Sherman.
                
                   You will have to earn your grade. I took this course online and the syllabus is very clear as to expectations and assignments. All the exams are multiple choice and not difficult, if you read/use the text. The toughest part are the case studies. Do NOT procrastinate.. You will regret it. Work hard and you can pass. Instructor is there to help!
                
                   You better be ready to read for hours for this class.  The tests are VERY tricky as multiple choice.  Not a whole lot of interaction either.  I can't imagine anyone getting an easy A in this class.  I wish I had taken a different instructor.
                
                   This Mgt 439 class is not typical of my experience.  I believe this would be a great class on campus, however, my experience online has been horrible.  Tests are based on best answer and concepts which require reading, but the material is vast and lengthy.  Do more than the bare minimum if you are expecting a B.  You will work really hard for an A!
                
                   His class lectures are current with discussions and  group projects that gives you confidence for the real world. The papers can be on Management topics of your choice. He will help you as long as you make the effort to ask him.  He is warm and has a good sense of humor.  You can make an A , if you don't procrastinate.
                
                   If you are good at writing you'll do fine.  Although you have to put in time for your analysis of each case study if you give lengthy details for as few as nine references (the bare minimum) you'll do fine. I got an A on an analysis less than 20 pages with the bare minimum amount of references. Follow all other requirements and you'll score high.
                
                   Extremely Tough grader, has high standards for grad level. No websites are allowed as sources must have 15 references used from the library. Be prepared for a ton of writing he does send out email lenghty emails of his findings of graded assignments and clarifies things well you have to put alot time into this1 I struggled but managed to get an A.
                
                   Professor Sewell is one of my favorites at TAMUC! He lectures during the whole class period with no notes or slides. However, he makes the lectures interesting and doesn't usually keep you the entire allotted time for class.
                
                   I took this class in the fall of 2014, and this was my first and only drop in 4 years.  The Learnsmart assignments on McGrawHill were so unorganized, and they would close before the syllabus due date.  I tried to email the professor, and I ended up dropping the class before he responded (2-3 weeks later.)  
                
                   I have taken all of my classes the last 3 years online, and I am an A student with academic scholarships.  I was unable to follow or understand the syllabus, and trying to sign into the Pearson material was a mess how he had it arranged.  Things would close before the due date.  Worst organized class I have ever tried to take.  First and only drop.
                
                   1. Instructor unavailable (1 short na response to an email sent).  2. Syllabus barely therenever goes with calendar  3. Abysmal help, no group contract 4. Reading assignments confusingnever match syllabus   5. A 'busy work' style group project due  6. Group work with little to no Project feedback or direction  7. Late grading-week of fina
                
                   1. Instructor unavailable or non-responsive often. 2. Syllabus doesn't match online platform overview 3. Syllabus changes midway through course 4. Reading assignments unclear with several syllabus discrepancies 5. Make-work assignments that are not graduate leve 6. Group work with little to no Project feedback or direction 7. Late grading
                
                   I took this online, and there is a lot of work, but it isn't that hard to complete. The group business plan was probably the toughest part, but as long as you are on a good team, it isn't too bad. Dr. Sewell always answered questions, and was definitely there to help! I would recommend him for this class!
                
                   Very bad communication. Poor quality of teaching.
                
                   Several written assignments per week, usually no more than 3 pages. Nothing hard, just a little research required. Exams require thorough reading of the text. Helpful teacher, just lots of work
                
                   Instrutor gives unclear information.  Does not provide effective feedback.  Requires alot of busy work.  You will ask yourself and the end if you even learned anything.  Answer maybe not, just you did a lot of work.
                
                   Lawd, I have never seen so much work from an instructor in my life. I am not absorbing anything- just turning in assignments! Run! find and Alt instructor! This is the work of three grad classes. Seriusly speaking. Its not hard but way too much!
                
                   Do your work and turn things in on time and there will be no problems.  No Discussion boards and about 10 - 2 page papers double spaced.
                
                   This is good instructor. Class was one of the most interesting classes I've had.  Creative exercises and super easy tests - if you mark your book or take notes from the chapters.  Want a cool class for once, take this instructor.
                
                   Decent professor. Grades simi-fair. Assigns a lot of busy work. You may think like I did an assume that it couldn't possibly be that much but it really is. I don't mind busy work but there was so much that it took me away from my other classes and I didn't learn anything from it. There is also a huge group business plan that you'll have to do.
                
                   This class was a waste of my $2500 and by no means a grad level course. There was no direction what so ever, he was late in responding to questions and e-mails, very slow grading process, there is no feedback on assignments, there is also a lot of work high-school/college freshman level work.
                
                   Insane amount of high school level busy work (even though he swears he doesn't give busy work).  Group project for online class is difficult, and he gives zero guidance. Seems random in his objective grading, and doesn't explain why he took points away. Disappointing course.
                
                   Enough with the whining, are you all 9&#63; Yes, it's a heavy course load, but if you paid 2K for a cakewalk go to a 5 star bakery.
                
                   Dr. Sewell was an awesome professor. I highly recommend for the Management courses. He is respectful, considerate, and he answers your questions timely. He makes learning interesting. There is a lot of work involved in his class but it is not overwhelming.
                
                   Gives WAY too much work! I really don't think this man understands the term work overload. Doens't return grades timely, email or message board resonses are vague, confusing, and usually don't answer your questions.  He is rude.  Wants you to do extra work, for no credit  Doesn't even provide a syllabus with due dates. Doesn't solve problems fast.
                
                   Dr. Sewell was extremely helpful and responsive to any and all questions. He does challenge students to think and requires quite a bit of writing in his class. But, I felt the workload was not exhaustive and felt I learned more from him than most other profs.
                
                   Terrific prof!!! I learned a lot. He is also extremely responsive and posts grades quickly. I felt he was extremely fair as well.
                
                   Great Teacher!
                
                   Very easy class if you do all the assignments and turn them in on time. There were three articles you had to do papers on, but she gives you about a month to do each one. In addition, there were discussions to go with each article (you also have about a month to complete). NSLS membership is required and was a great experience.
                
                   Excellent instructor, thorough in evaluations of papers, and will recommend this instructor to anyone.
                
                   She's a great person outside of class, but as a teacher she is very tough and thorough.
                
                   Please DO NOT TAKE THIS professor! She gives very poor grades for papers and discussions. Extremely hard grader and very critical. I followed all instructions for the assignment and she marked off with no clear reason r feedback or reason. She is rude and I learned nothing in this class. Very poor teaching skills! Please Do not take!
                
                   Prof Sadler is not clear on instruction and counts off an enormous amount of points for small errors.  If you do the discussion boards the way she states you should, you still won't get a 100 on them. I feel she is one of those teachers that doesn't believe in As. Of all my professors at A&M, she is by the worst and her class isn't interesting.
                
                   Dr. Sadler was challenging, but fair. This was an online 8 week course, so it was pretty fast paced with lots of reading and writing. She was a stickler for APA style writing on the papers, but otherwise graded more than fair. I will be taking other courses she will be teaching.
                
                   Avoid this teacher if at all possible. Unhelpful, and insincere. Says one thing but means another.
                
                   Be very careful, especially online as she gives no clear direction.
                
                   Not perfectly clear up front; changes dates and assignments;
                
                   Wow....she is beautiful inside and out.....very nice to people...really sweet...she helps out a lot. She messed up on my grade once and fixed it very quickly....good prof would take her again.
                
                   T. Sadler is a terrible teacher. She can't even follow her own rules. Who cares what she looks like, that has NO effect on what my grade is. She is a coward, who will not confront her students when she knows she has made a mistake that has effected their grade!
                
                   Anyone with eyes - male or female - can see that she is hot - - but she is also an exceptional teacher and educator.  She is better than many of the profs with Ph. D.'s.
                
                   great to look at; good professor; easy to understand; very sensitive person
                
                   Great teacher very nice to the students. Willing to help and covers material very well. Will tell whats going to be on the tests. Can get boring in class while she goes over powerpoint presentations. Print off powerpoint notes off her website don't really have to buy book.
                
                   She is really sweet, and wants everyone to do well in her class. She lectures by powerpoint, and puts them all online, so you really don't need to be in class except that class participation is worth 20% or your grade, so it gets kind of boring. Otherwise, her tests are super easy common sense stuff and I might mention she's nice to look at too 0:)
                
                   A great professor.  Lectures great and learned a great deal.  She made me change my major to management.  Very sensitive.  Take in person; not online.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great prof.  To the point.  She gives good reviews.
                
                   She was a good teacher, though she did pick obscure topics it was to only insure that her students were actualy reading the book.  Learned a good deal, and was happy with my grade.  Would recomend the on-line class.
                
                   Very caring professor who is one of my favorites. She is very confusing but is available if you need clarification. Bless her heart, her lectures are rambling and poorly delivered. I gave up after listening to a couple, but it won't hurt you in the class. She does like for you to write, A LOT! So get a good team or you'll be in big trouble. 
                
                   Very nice professor that is a little scatter-brained but always willing to help. She often has conflicting instructions (Syllabus vs Emails) and forgets things, but if you push her she will always make it right. Fairly easy "A" if you ask questions and love to write. There is A LOT of writing. Everything was writing, including the final exam. 
                
                   Enjoyed the material taught.  A number of highly weighted assignments are team based, so you feel you have less control over your grade. She is generous w grading however.
                
                   Summer II class. She seems like a very nice lady and seems to care for her students. But... The curriculum is confusing, unclear objectives, conflicting due dates, and extra work you won't get graded on. Her signature bloc is chock-full of accolades relating to her teaching prowess, and I can't figure out why. You must read her textbook to pass.
                
                   Rubric is not the clearest I've seen.  Feedback can be slow if provided at all.  Tests are very long (avg. 4 hours).  For team paper - follow APA Guidelines to the T (Cite, cite, cite).  However, obtaining a good grade is still very attainable.  Follow the instructions for each assignment and you should do well.
                
                   Very tough course if you do not plan your work ahead of time. Dr. Pryor is very flexible and fair. Total of 3 group papers, 2 exams, and 2 individual papers (one of which is the strategic audit). Make sure you pick the right group to join for the projects. I was more than lucky to get a great team for this class and it helped TREMENDOUSLY.  
                
                   Great course and professor. There was 4 papers (2 group and 2 individual) and 2 written exam. I wrote over 60 pages of materials (double spaced). I would recommend this course and this professor, make sure you are ready to learn and do quite a bit of writing. The book is also heavily used and helps you with completing the written materials.
                
                   Strategic Management is going to be a labor intensive course with any professor. It consisted of: 30 page strategic analysis, group strategic analysis, group paper, 2 powerpoints, 2 exams, and a personal analysis. A lot of work but Dr. Pryor was there each step of the way. She's cares and is very nurturing.
                
                   Dr Pryor is very understanding and will work with you at all times. Very good on communication and grades fairly. I made a B in the class and would take her class again.
                
                   After reading the previous reviews, I was kind of scared because I thought it would be a hard class.  But honestly, it wasn't.  The professor was very flexible with due dates and extremely helpful.  As long as you put in the effort and complete the work on time, you will do well.
                
                   Dr.Pryor is very help and fair with grading. If you follow the guidelines for the assignments you will do well in the course. The syllabus for the course was a little confusing, but overall this was a good class.
                
                   A great professor who really cares about her students.  Her classes are tough but if you follow the syllabus and put in the work you will learn something and get a decent grade.
                
                   She wrote the book that you use in the class and she is very knowledgeable. Not the best professor when it comes to clarity or the use of technology but always available via email and always very helpful. Isn't the hardest class if you do the work and don't get too hung up on details other than making sure you write everything in APA.
                
                   Tough material but Professor Pryor was very engaged and answered questions quickly. Also graded work quickly.  If you put in the work (a lot of work) you will do well.
                
                   I was expecting to learn something in this class, but all she comes up with is grammar and APA corrections, no feedback on the work or the research contents. And she gives loads of homework which doesnt make sense to me, if there is no learning curve. try to avoid her ..
                
                   Overall she is a very nice professor, although there is alot of work. If you work hard and do the assignments you are guaranteed a good grade.
                
                   Very nice prof but a ton of mandatory work that would not even be graded. There is no doubt that one will learn something after take home exams, online exams, one group paper and two individual papers
                
                   Dr. Pryor is unique. There is little doubt in my mind that she truly cares about her students. The course syllabus was incredibly convoluted and the exams were very frustrating. I'm not sure if this was part of her teaching process or not. I wound up with an A and, believe it or not, I would recommend her. Online Course
                
                   This class was for the EMBA, and I thought it was a great class.  There was a lot of reading, but she did not grade papers too hard.  She does expect you to utilize your readings in your weekly papers.  Overall a pretty easy A if you do the reading.
                
                   Took her class online. Lots of writing (over 100 pages) and it was hard to figure out what she was looking for. Over half my class dropped out. However, she does care about her students, reads every paper, and provides feedback. Although I was miserable in this class, it did improve once I knew what she expected and I did learn.
                
                   You will need the textbook for the final.  However, most of the assignments require substantial outside reference support.  Reference support is key to doing well on her assignments, as is clear discussion of the subject matter.  She's a hard grader with high expectations but it's worth taking the class.  I learned a lot.
                
                   Dr. Pane assigned two long cases (15-20 pages), two short cases (7-10 pages) and a take-home final that is multiple choice and an essay.  She is EXTREMELY clear on how to succeed in her class.  Read all materials provided in doc sharing, provide well-thought, well written papers with peer reviewed journals for support and you will get an A.
                
                   You will be writing... a lot. I repeat... A LOT! Your case study papers will be about 15-20+ pages long with about 20+ references. If this standard is not met, you're getting a B or C, period. The final exam... writing. Dr. Pane grade very fairly and she gives you clear warning about what she expects from your papers. DO NOT BE LAZY OR ELSE!!!!
                
                   Not an easy class unless you're very comfortable with writing research papers. The case studies and final ( four long essays)are challenging, but if you dig in and stay up with it, you will learn a lot. Dr. Pane was tough, but helpful and responsive for the most part. I would definitely take another class from her.
                
                   Instructor requires 3 cases, 3 small papers, and a final that consists of 4 questions. A high number of quality article sources are required for cases, papers, and the final. Be expansive in writing and things will be fine.
                
                   As others have mentioned, this class required 3 case studies, 3 shorter papers, and a take-home final that is also 4 separate research topics. This professor does put a lot of weight on quality of references, quantity of references and length of paper. She makes this clear. My papers ranged from 8-14 pages with 20+ references per and I got an A.
                
                   The review below me is exactly correct.  The course is nothing but writing academic research papers.  Nothing could be less useful for a job in the real world and I have learned nothing about management.  To compound the issue, the 3 main papers have to be 20+ pages long to get an A.  A waste of time, money, and opportunity to learn.
                
                   The course work for this course does not fit the description of this course. This is suppose to be a Management Skills Development course, instead it is a research course. The course consists of three case studies, two smaller papers, and four research essays as the final. I learned very little about enhancing management skills.
                
                   This class was easier than I thought it would be.  As long as you stay on top of your work and do not procrastinate, you'll do well.  The cases are time consuming and require a lot of effort.
                
                   Didn't use the book other than for test.  Follow APA and get lots of references and you will do great!
                
                   Take Dr Pane for any class you can. She isnt the easiest but is one of the most helpful professors you'll ever have.
                
                   Great professor. Will make you a better writer. She is tough on references. Tests are not that difficult. Concentrate on cases and don't get behind. She is tough but fair
                
                   Concentrate on papers and the rest is a piece of cake. 20 references min. per paper gets you an A. It's not hard if you get 5-7 good sources & use their references as well. Make sure to use perfect AMJ (not APA) & you shouldn't have a problem getting a good grade.
                
                   Professor never responds to emails, and makes excuses for herself from her personal life.  She is more worried about where you get your references from than what content your papers carry.  Do not expect an A, even if you normally get all A's.
                
                   Book is only used for weekly postings & final exam.   Weekly postings are not read by professor since she does not leave any feedback and grade postings at 5% of grade. Bi-weekly papers are the meat of your grade and are very annoying to write since she wants about 10 external sources from specific &quot;quality&quot; journals.If Greater writer you get a B!
                
                   Probably not the best class to take during summer session. Dr. Pane does not cut any slack for summer classes. If you will manage your time well, everything will work out. She is very responsive, but a stickler on APA-AMJ and discussion posts and cases and a very long take home final covering the entire textbook.
                
                   Although tough, Dr.Pane is an excellent professor. The case analyses further your understanding of subject matter, and better prepare you for fuutre research projects. She provides in-depth comments to help you correct APA mistakes and case concept applications. Weekly discussion posts are mandatory, and live chat optional (online Spring 2008).
                
                   Not recommended at all otherwise expect your first C
                
                   Very poor you have been warned take some other experienced professors!!!
                
                   Terrible. Worst teacher ever, AVOID at all cost!  And I'm an A Student.
                
                   She is a pretty,nice,fun teacher. I am an international student,and I can understnad her class well. However, her exam will be very hard for us(not only international students).   I LIKE HER, BUT HER TEST IS MY NIGHMARE....
                
                   Textbook was useless, her teaching style is fragmented, unorganized, and very confusing.  The sylabus was not followed.  Materials that were not supposed to be on the test were. In a teams class, we spent very little time in teams.  Dr. O'Neal is a nice person and the class was entertaining, but it could have been much better.
                
                     This was the hardest class that I have ever taken.  I almost quit half way through it but I'm glad that  didn't.  This class is a lot of work but in the end, you will feel like you really learned something.  It is best if you take this class alone due to the amount of work.  I would also stress getting into a group with hard working peers. 
                
                   1st piece of advice DO NOT TAKE THIS WITH ANOTHER COURSE. 4 group assignments all over 60 pages, 2 individual exams both over 30 pages. Expect to do ALOT of research and writing. I do not agree with him giving 95's as the highest grade possible. Plus the Discussions are full blown lit reviews. Pick a solid a group of 5 thats ready to work nonstop.
                
                   One of the hardest classes I've ever taken.  You are gonna write 15 page papers like it's your job.  Helpful and nice teacher, but his expectations are a tad high in my opinion.  I think he assumes his students must be full time MBA students or something with the time commitment he expects.
                
                   This professor is the real deal.Follow Dr.Hayek's instructions carefully, prepare to work hard, and you'll be OK.He responds to student's E-mails and that is refreshing.Initially, I was afraid to take this class but major kudos to Dr.Hayek for being super encouraging.He is very knowledgeable but yet humble.This is what makes a great professor.
                
                   Be sure to read the syllabus CAREFULLY.  Missing the most seemingly minute details can get you burnt.  I got a B in this class, when I knew I was capable of an I, because I made that mistake.  The exams are not just simply answering the questions; you're making a 15-20 page paper out of that exams.  Not realizing that on my first exam cost me my A.
                
                   Mario is the single best teacher I've had at TAMU-C for evaluating written work. His detailed feedback is excellent, relevant, and accurate. Prepare to work hard and write a lot. Performance expectations are very clear, as he provides samples from previous students for you to benchmark against. Put in the effort and grading will be fair/logical.
                
                   Took for capstone,answers email right away, extremely clear expectations.  3 group papers, 2 essay exams, and 5 discussion postings.  Get with a good group, alot of work, but attainable A
                
                   Great professor. Very thorough and clear with expectations. Answer emails promptly day/night/weekends. Very helpful with students. There is a lot of work. 3 group papers, 2 written exams, 1 individual paper and discussion forums. I like the way he structured learning and think that he is real smart
                
                   I really enjoyed his class.  He was very prompt with feedback and even seemed to listen to students when we asked for an extension on a project.  Highly recommend.
                
                   I can not recommend him.  He is not very engaged in his classes.  He requires 100 word summaries on the text and a WSJ article a week and a couple small project papers.  He is very strict on grammar and will knock off 3 to 4 points out of 15 if he finds anything.  Overall, If you want a good grade and to learn something valuable, look elsewhere!
                
                   Dr. Cotton is tough and an excellent professor. He uses a different approach, requiring 100-word summaries of applicable WSJ articles to demonstrate concept learning and application from the week's assigned text chapters (usu. 2 ch./wk), as well as learning to write well succinctly. The region report research project was fun! (Fall 2008 online).
                
                   One short &quot;paper&quot; a week plus 2 long ones.  If you can not write english well, you will be in trouble.  I really liked the class overall.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Class is not too tough and professor tells good stories about when he used to work in the real world.
                
                   Class not as easy as some others but he tells good stories and class was not on-line.  He came to downtown and we appreaciated that.  His wife also seemed to be very nice.  I used some of what I learned for my own business.
                
                   His classes can be tough if you don't understand how to write proper papers - otherwise is pretty good.
                
                   His class was challenging to the international students but pretty easy for people who spoke English well.
                
                   His classes can be challenging if you are not an American but generally his stories are good.
                
                   Very serious professor.
                
                   Great storyteller.
                
                   Cotton tells the best stories that relate to the class. I like him a lot.
                
                   He is new but has a lot of experience.  Pay him respect and he'll respect you as well.  He does have high standards.
                
                   He seems friendly although he is tough and serious.
                
                   Likes students.
                
                   very good
                
                   He seems like a good professor.  Carraher recommends him but you do have to take him seriously.
                
                   Very good background.  You have to take the class seriously.
                
                   very nice professor
                
                   BORING!!!!!!
                
                   Nice to work with him.If we can follow his schedule, you will get an A easily.
                
                   
                
                   I got an A by the skin of my teeth. This was a challenging course for me. Lots of mathematics and definitions. You have a quiz and exam on each module. The quiz is all math problems. You also have weekly discussions, sometimes two topics in one week. You need to pay attention to deadlines because there is no make-ups at all.
                
                   Very well organized online course with 4 quizzes and 4 exams straight from the book. Read the text thoroughly and you'll do great!
                
                   WOW! Ms Anderson really knows how to teach an online class! She posted videos to help clarify concepts and work through the math. She requires a lot on the discussion boards, but she interacts with us too. First time in an online class that I felt like I got to know my prof. She is truely the BEST teacher I have ever had.
                
                   Ms. Anderson is a great teacher
                
                   Great instructor, useful knowledge base.  Helpful with assignments, tests.
                
                   very encouraging, &knowledgable. Holds students responsible for their own actions. Teaches those who wants to learn!
                
                   This professor is great.  She is hard but fair.  I would recommend if you want to learn something.  She will work butt off but makes class worth doing.
                
                   She is a lot of fun and very easy going.
                
                   Class isnt bad, shes a good teacher, but wants a lot of student input. The tests arent hard but she grades picky, also she gives two essays and have to do that stupid APA format which i hate more than anything and is useless to anything i will do in real life. but nice lady and class is pretty cool actually.
                
                   Ms. Anderson is a great techer. She knows how to teach and explain it in english so it is better to understand. She is very helpfull if you just ask. She is very willing to get to know her students. Just be sure to participate in the class it will help you alot and don't be afraid to take to her after class.
                
                   Well organized and knows how to teach online class. I would recommend based on intellegence of subject matter and student oriented.  She makes it clear what is expected of you from beginning. Use of dissussion question were relevant and stimulating. You will learn alot in her class. Highly recommend.
                
                   Wakefield is a great guy. He is hilarious and makes the class lectures awesome. He gives quizzes every lecture but you can use your notes on them so make sure you read and write some notes down. Knows what he is talking about and I would take him again if I could. 
                
                   Great prof!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome guy
                
                   Trez has been one of my most favorite professors at A&M!  He is HILARIOUS!  This class was particularly easy.  Although he won't be teaching it next semester.  Easy A.  He does Chick-Fil-A hours for those of us who couldn't meet on campus.  Very easy going and willing to help.  Definitely one of those professors that invests their time in you.
                
                   Professor Jones, who prefers to go by "Trez", is a great professor. This particular class was for strictly transfer students. He had us do scavenger hunts around campus in order to learn where things are located as well as learn history about the school. He is a fair grader and makes time for students to talk with him through office hours
                
                   Rhonda is my girl. There are a lot of assignments, but she provides such clear directions and gives you PLENTY of time to complete them. Super fun professor to listen to. I would take her for every class if I could!
                
                   Professor Fowler is a wonderful professor. She does not focus on testing over content, rather assigning projects and presentations for students to demonstrate what they have learned in the class. Only three or four quizzes throughout the semester and one final exam which is under 35 questions. 
                
                   Nice and charismatic! Her lecture are very audience involved, encouraging personal stories that relate to the curriculum. Several essays and projects, but few tests. 
                
                   Rocks!
                
                   this professor was amazing! i wish she would come back to texas! we miss her :)
                
                   this class rocks
                
                   cool
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Good professor, great lectures, group projects are hardest part of class, he is vague with the group projects and grades them very strictly.
                
                   He is a great teacher but a hard grader! He is super strict on the group project grading. His tests aren't too hard but challenging. You will learn a lot of useful things in his class. I would recommend his class to everyone.
                
                   This is my second semester having this professor. Both times the assignments were fairly easy. One page singled spaced papers is all that is required. If and when confused, he was more than hepfull.
                
                   Of all the profs in in the business college he really doesn't seem to care about the people in his class or there future.
                
                   I took this class online during summer 2011. Professor was great and graded paper in a timely manner, usually within 2 days. This is probably the easiest &quot;A&quot; a junior/senior student can receive. If you know how to write critical analysis papers, then you should have not problems - 15 short one page papers in 6 weeks.
                
                   I took two classes with Dr. Shao Bin, and I enjoyed both and scored A in each.  Excellent professor, helpful, cooperative, and willing to explain any unclear requirements. 
                
                   Turrible as Charles Barkley would say.
                
                   Very nice professor. Lots of videos. Always willing to help. Not easy but if you watch all videos and follow instruction you' ll be fine.
                
                   He is one of the best professors in my academic life. Although he gives a lot of homework, it is directly to the point. He gives clear direction on how to do the homework. And he gives very clear feedback on homework. He is like the only professor that reads and comments on every single line of your paper. Be serious+ do the homework  you get an A
                
                   learned a lot uses great video I still remember years after
                
                   one of my best classes in undergrad
                
                   Dr. Li is one of the best professors in the COB. He really cares about his students and still says hi to me every time I see him in the hallway. His tests aren't easy, but he does give you a study guide that you need to know FRONT AND BACK. Also, you get to use the buddy system on tests so that makes it better!
                
                   The best educator of my tenure at West Texas A&M.  Dr Li is well prepared for class, fosters a dynamic class with student interaction and teamwork.  Assignments are geared towards the need for reading the text.  You will definitely take away useful tools from this class including understanding yourself better.
                
                   
                
                   Run away people! Don't take her class unless you want a C+ or lower than that.
                
                   Lots of group projects and tons of reading every week. Textbooks have no traditional structure and Dr. Hammer does not providing guidance on what to focus on. Students prepare all lectures, but professor provides no feedback to students. Just by signing up, you lose 5% because no one is perfect according to Dr. Hammer. Worst professor ever!! Run!!!
                
                   With 6 group projects and two textbooks, including 4-6 chapters of reading material per week. One of the assigned textbook (Kahneman) is not about ethics and would be more suitable for a psychology course. The other text (Thanu) is poorly written and only takes into account the worst case scenarios. I will avoid this professor in the future!
                
                   Dr. Hammer is not a bad professor. Group discussions are due by midweek and replies to group discussions are due by Fridays. Because this is an online class quizzes and test are mostly from what is read in the book. You do not have the option to view the quiz after you have completed so you will not be able to see what questions you got wrong
                
                   Took the class online. Expect her to grade your discussions pretty hard. Even though she expects "3-5 sentences" for discussion posts, be prepared to write up a couple paragraphs if you want a decent grade. Chapter quizzes are 5 questions each with a time limit of 10 minutes.
                
                   Excellent Professor! He is very good at explaining the course material and provides you the resources needed to pass the course. As long as you work hard and study, you will be fine. 
                